Hawaii, session 2026, SB184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 342G-105, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The amount due from deposit beverage distributors shall be the net number of deposit beverage containers sold, donated, or transferred multiplied by the sum of the prevailing deposit beverage container fee and the refund value of [5 cents.] 10 cents.  Payment shall be made by check or money order payable to the "Department of Health, State of Hawaii".  All inventory reports and payments shall be made no later than the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the payment period of the previous month." SECTION 2.  Section 342G-110, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  [By January 1, 2005, every]  Every deposit beverage container sold in this State shall have a refund value of [5 cents.] 10 cents.  Each container shall have the refund value clearly indicated on it as provided in section 342G-112." SECTION 3.  Section 342G-111, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (f) to read as follows: "(f)  The amount due from a deposit beverage distributor shall be the net number of deposit beverage containers sold multiplied by the sum of the prevailing deposit beverage container fee and the deposit value of [5 cents.] 10 cents.  Payment shall be made by check or money order payable to the "Department of Health, State of Hawaii".  All reports and payments shall be made no later than the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the previous payment period." SECTION 4.  Section 342G-112, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  Subsection (a) shall not apply to any type of refillable glass deposit beverage container that has a brand name permanently marked on it and that has the equivalent of a refund value of at least [5 cents,] 10 cents, which is paid upon receipt of the container by a dealer or deposit beverage distributor." SECTION 5.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________